en: Chicken salads
hr: Salate od piletine
lt: Salotos su vištiena
nl: Kipsalades
pl: Sałatki z kurczakiem

en: Tuna salads, Tuna salad
de: Thunfischsalat
es: Ensalada de atún
fi: tonnikalasalaatti
fr: Salades au thon
hr: Salate od tune
it: Insalata di tonno
lt: Salotos su tunu
nl: Tonijnsalades
pl: Sałatki z tuńczykiem, Sałatka z tuńczyka, Sałatka z tuńczykiem
pt: Saladas de atum

en: Canned prepared salads
fr: Salades préparées en conserve
hr: Konzervirane pripremljene salate
lt: Paruoštos konservuotos salotos

en: Salads with meat
hr: Salate s mesom
lt: Salotos su mėsa
pl: Sałatki z mięsem

en: Salads with fish
hr: Salate s ribom
lt: Salotos su žuvimi
nl: Vissalades
pl: Sałatki z rybami

en: Prepared and canned salad with meat
fr: Salades composées en conserve à la viande, Salades de viande en conserve
hr: Pripremljena i konzervirana salata s mesom
lt: Paruoštos konservuotos salotos su mėsa

en: Prepared and canned salad with fish
fr: Salades composées en conserve au poisson, Salades de poisson en conserve
hr: Pripremljena i konzervirana salata s ribom
lt: Paruoštos konservuotos salotos su žuvimi

en: Tuna and vegetable salads
fr: Salades de thon et légumes
hr: Salate od tune i povrća
lt: Salotos su tunu ir daržovėmis

en: Canned prepared mixed tuna and vegetable salad
fr: Salade de thon et légumes en conserve, Salade de thon et légumes appertisée
hr: Konzervirana pripremljena miješana salata od tune i povrća
lt: Paruoštos konservuotos salotos su tunu ir daržovėmis

en: Prepared vegan salads, Vegan prepared salads, Vegan salads
sv: Veganska sallader

fr: Salades catalanes
nl: Catalaanse salades

en: Mexican salads
fr: Salades mexicaines
hr: Meksičke salate
lt: Meksikietiškos salotos
nl: Mexicaanse salades

en: Cucumber salads
de: Gurken Salate
fi: Kurkkusalaatit
fr: Salades de concombres
hr: Salate od krastavaca
lt: Salotos su agurkais
nl: Komkommersalades

en: Bulgur salads
fr: Salades de boulgour
hr: Salate od bulgura
lt: Salotos su bulgur
nl: Bulgursalades

en: Lentil salads
fr: Salades de lentilles
hr: Salate od leće
lt: Salotos su lęšiais
nl: Linzensalade

en: Beets salads, Beetroot salads
da: Salater med rødbede
de: Rüben-Salate, Rübensalate
fi: punajuurisalaatit
fr: Salades de betteraves
hr: Salate od cikle
lt: Salotos su burokėliais, Burokėlių salotos
nl: Bietjessalade
sv: Sallader med rödbet

en: Scandinavian beetroot salads
da: Rødbedesalater
nb: Rødbetsalater
nn: Rødbetsalatar
sv: Rödbetssallader

en: Vegan Scandinavian beetroot salads
da: Veganske rødbedesalater
nb: Veganske rødbetsalater
nn: Veganske rødbetsalatar
sv: Veganska rödbetssallader

en: Caesar salads, Caesar's salad, Chicken salad with croûtons sauce
es: Ensalada césar
fi: Caesarsalaatit
fr: Salades caesar, Salades césar, Salade César au poulet, Salade verte au poulet avec fromage croûtons et sauce
hr: Cezar salate
ja: シーザーサラダ
lt: Cezario salotos
nl: Caesarsalade
pl: Sałatka Cezar

en: Vegetable salads
de: Gemüsesalat
fi: Kasvissalaatit
fr: Salades de légumes
hr: Salate od povrća
it: Insalate di verdure
lt: Salotos su daržovėmis
nl: Groentesalade
pl: Sałatki z warzywami